Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2217
Weighing and measuring establishment permit; suspend or revoke; grounds.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the department may suspend or revoke a permit issued to a retail dealer pursuant to section 89-187.01 if the retail dealer fails to comply with subsection (1) of section 66-2211.

(2) Beginning April 1, 2028, the department may suspend or revoke a permit issued to a retail dealer pursuant to section 89-187.01 if the retail dealer fails to comply with subsection (2) of section 66-2211.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 10.